Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 17 DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES — WATER RESOURCE BOARD
§ 42-1717. Jurisdiction over supervision of maintenance, operation and inspection of dams and mine tailings impoundment structures.

Supervision over the maintenance and operation of dams, reservoirs and mine tailings impoundment structures insofar as necessary to safeguard life and property from injury by reason of the failure thereof is vested in the director of the department of water resources. The director shall at state expense inspect or cause to be inspected, as often as he thinks advisable, every dam used for holding water and mine tailings impoundment structure used for holding tailings slurry in this state; however, all dams or mine tailings impoundment structures regulated by the department shall be inspected at least once every five (5) years, and if after any such inspection such dam or mine tailings impoundment structure, in the opinion of the director, is unsafe, and life or property liable to be endangered by reason thereof, the director shall give written notice and order by certified mail or by personal service upon the owner or owners to remove or repair the same so as to make it safe. If such owner or owners shall neglect or refuse to remove or repair the same after notice to that effect has been given in writing by the director, the director may draw off all or part of such water from behind such dam, embankment or mine tailings slurry from behind mine tailings impoundment structure and keep said water or mine tailings slurry drawn off until such time as the orders shall be complied with. In determining whether or not a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure or proposed dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure constitutes or would constitute a danger to life or property, the director shall take into consideration the possibility that the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure might be endangered by overtopping, seepage, settlement, erosion, cracking, earth movement or other conditions which exist or might occur in any area in the vicinity of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

No action shall be brought against the state, the water resource board, the director, or the department of water resources or their respective agents or employees for the recovery of damages caused by the partial or total failure of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure or through the operation of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure upon the ground that such defendant is liable by virtue of any of the following:

The approval of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

The issuance or enforcement of orders relative to maintenance or operation of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

Control and regulation of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

Measures taken to protect against failure during an emergency.

The use of design and construction criteria prepared by the department.

The failure to issue or enforce orders, to control or regulate dams, or to take measures to protect against dam failure.

No action shall be brought by the state against the owner for pollution which may occur in the event that the director orders emergency dumping or bypassing.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to relieve an owner or operator of a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure of the legal duties, obligations or liabilities incident to the ownership or operation of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

The findings and orders of the director and the certificate of approval of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure issued by the director are final and conclusive and binding upon all state agencies, regulatory or otherwise, as to the safety of design, construction, maintenance and operation of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

The director may require owners to keep records of, and to report on, maintenance, operation, staffing and engineering and geologic investigations, and the water resource board shall issue such rules as necessary to secure maintenance and operation and to require staffing and engineering and geologic investigations which will safeguard life and property. In addition, the owner of a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure or his agent shall fully and promptly advise the department of any sudden or unprecedented flood or unusual or alarming circumstance or occurrence affecting the safety of the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure. The director, from time to time, shall make inspections of dams, reservoirs and mine tailings impoundment structures at state expense for the purpose of determining their safety, but shall require owners to perform at their expense such work as necessary to disclose information sufficient to enable the director to determine conditions of dams, reservoirs, and mine tailings impoundment structures in regard to their safety and to perform at their expense other work necessary to secure maintenance and operation which will safeguard life and property.

§ 42-1718. Remedial means for protection of life and property.

The director shall immediately employ any remedial means necessary to protect life and property if either:

The condition of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure is so dangerous to the safety of life or property as not to permit time for the issuance and enforcement of an order relative to maintenance or operation.

Passing or imminent floods threaten the safety of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure.

Take such other steps as may be essential to safeguard life and property.

In applying the remedial means provided for in this act, the department may in emergency do any of the following:

(a) Lower the water level by releasing water from the reservoir or lower mine tailings slurry level by releasing slurry from the mine tailings impoundment structure.

(b) Completely empty the reservoir.

The director shall continue in full charge and control of such dam or reservoir, or both, or mine tailings impoundment structure, or all, and its appurtenances, until they are rendered safe or the emergency occasioning the action has ceased.

If the cost of the emergency remedial action by the director for the protection of life and property exceeds the amount of money appropriated from the general fund specifically for that purpose, the additional costs may be defrayed by the issuance of deficiency warrants as may be authorized by the board of examiners. When so authorized, the state controller shall draw deficiency warrants against the general fund.

The cost and expenses of the remedial means provided in this act, including cost of any work done to render a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure or its appurtenances safe, shall be recoverable by the state from the owner. If not paid within sixty (60) days of invoice, action may be brought by the director in the district court of the district wherein the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure or any part thereof is situated. The funds recovered shall be returned to the general fund to offset the amount of the deficiency warrant.

No action shall be brought by the state against the owner for pollution which may occur in the event that the director orders emergency dumping or bypassing.

§ 42-1719. Issuance of certificates of approval — Revocation — Appeal.

A certificate of approval shall be issued for all dams and mine tailings impoundment structures, new or existing, upon a finding that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water or the mine tailings impoundment structure is safe to impound mine tailings slurry within the limitations prescribed in the certificate. Upon written request by an owner for a certificate of approval, the director shall within fourteen (14) days inspect or cause to be inspected and issue a certificate if he finds that the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure is safe to impound water or tailings slurry within the limitations prescribed in the certificate. Pending the issuance of a certificate of approval, the owner of a new dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure shall not, through action or inaction, cause the dam or reservoir to impound water or mine tailings impoundment structure to impound mine tailings slurry.

Each certificate of approval issued may contain such terms and conditions as the director may prescribe. The director may revoke any certificate of approval whenever he determines that the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure constitutes a danger to life and property. Whenever he deems such action necessary to safeguard life and property, the director may also amend the terms and conditions of any such certificate by issuing a new certificate containing the revised terms and conditions. The owner of a dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure for which a certificate of approval has been issued shall not, through action or inaction, cause the dam or reservoir to impound water or mine tailings impoundment structure to impound mine tailings slurry after the certificate terminates unless a new certificate is issued for the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure. Those inflows that cannot be diverted may still be allowed to enter the structure, but the lowest possible level must be maintained until safety of the structure is assured. A new certificate shall be issued upon a finding by the director that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water or mine tailings impoundment structure is safe to impound tailings slurry within the limits prescribed in the certificate.

No action shall be brought by the state against the owner for pollution which may occur in the event that the director orders emergency dumping or bypassing.

With respect to written consent for use of a dam which has been issued and which is in effect prior to the effective date of this act or mine tailings impoundment structure which has been issued and which is in effect prior to the effective date of amendment, the director shall issue a new certificate of approval, which shall supersede the previous written consent for use, or shall contain such terms and conditions as the director may prescribe or shall revoke the existing written consent for use if he finds that the dam or reservoir is not safe to impound water or that the mine tailings impoundment structure is not safe to impound mine tailings slurry.

§ 42-1720. Violations of chapter — Penalties.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any order of the director or of any rule of the water resource board where a copy of the order or rule has been served upon said person by certified mail as herein provided, and said person fails to comply therewith within the time herein provided, or within ten (10) days of such service if not otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. In the event of a continuing violation, each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate and distinct offense.

Any person who willfully obstructs, hinders, or prevents the director, the department or its agents or employees from performing the duties imposed by this chapter or who willfully resists the exercise of the control and supervision conferred by this chapter upon the director, the department or its agents or employees is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any owner or any person acting as a director, officer, agent or employee of an owner, or any contractor or agent or employee of a contractor who engages in the construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, maintenance or removal of any dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure, who knowingly does work or permits work to be executed on the dam, reservoir or mine tailings impoundment structure without an approval or in violation of or contrary to any approval as provided for in this chapter, or any inspector, agent or employee of the department who has knowledge of such work being done and who fails to immediately notify the director thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Whenever any party or parties feel themselves aggrieved by the determination of the director in refusing to approve any plan or specification as mentioned in this chapter, or by any order of the director, such party or parties may seek a hearing before the director in accordance with section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code, if a hearing has not already been held, and may seek judicial review in accordance with section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code, of any final order of the director issued following a hearing.

When the director of the department of water resources determines that any person is in substantial violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule, certificate, condition of approval or order issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter, the director may commence an administrative enforcement action by issuing a written notice of violation in accordance with the provisions of section 42-1701B, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1721. Initial construction, lift construction, enlargement, or alteration of tailings impoundment structures — Submission of duplicate plans, drawings and specifications.

Owners who shall desire to construct, or enlarge, or alter or repair, meaning only such alterations or repairs as may affect the safety of the structure, any mine tailings impoundment structure for the purpose of storing mine tailings slurry when the same is to be more than thirty (30) feet in height shall submit duplicate plans, drawings and specifications of the proposed work to the director, and construction of the new mine tailings impoundment structure, alteration or repair shall not be commenced until the owner has applied for and obtained written approval of the plans, drawings and specifications.

Owners of mine tailings impoundment structures upon which construction, lift construction, enlargement or alteration is under way on July 1, 1978, and for which plans, drawings and specifications would be required if such work had commenced subsequent to July 1, 1978, shall submit plans, drawings and specifications with respect to that portion of the work to be performed subsequent to July 1, 1978, as are required, together with the fee established hereinafter. In the event that the owner fails to submit such plans, drawings and specifications contemplated by this paragraph within sixty (60) days, the director shall give notice to owners to submit plans, drawings and specifications, and failure to submit plans, drawings and specifications within thirty (30) days of the date of mailing the notice shall be punishable as provided in this chapter. Construction, lift construction, enlargement, or alteration which is under way on July 1, 1978 may be stopped upon issuance of an order by the director for good cause shown, as determined by the director. The notice and/or order provided for in this paragraph shall state the good cause for stoppage determined by the director and shall be given by personal service or certified mail and a return receipt signed by the owner or responsible company shall constitute prima facie evidence of service.

Upon receipt of the plans, drawings and specifications, the director shall give consideration thereto and shall approve or disapprove the same within the time provided in this section, and if approved, the director shall affix his approval thereto and return one (1) copy of such plans, drawings and specifications, with his approval, to the party or parties proposing to construct the works.

Plans, drawings and specifications submitted to the director complete with fees shall be approved or disapproved in no more than sixty (60) days and in no less than fourteen (14) days after receipt. Defective plans, drawings and specifications made in a bona fide attempt to conform to the law and rules and regulations of the water resource board shall not be rejected but notice of defect stating in detail the defect or defects found in the plans, drawings or specifications shall be sent to the owner by certified mail. If within thirty (30) days of the date of mailing the notice the owner does not file amended plans, drawings and specifications, the plans, drawings and specifications shall be rejected and cancelled unless, for good cause shown, the director allows the owner further time.

The construction of all mine tailings impoundment structures under plans, drawings and specifications approved by the director shall be pursued with reasonable diligence to completion, taking into consideration the nature of and purpose for which said construction, lift construction, enlargement or alteration is made.
The plans, drawings and specifications shall include the following information:

The name and address of the owner.

The location, type, size and height of the proposed mine tailings impoundment structure and appurtenant works.

The storage capacity of the impoundment area.

Such other pertinent information as the director may require consistent with good engineering practice including the following:

Data concerning subsoil and foundation conditions and materials entering into construction of the mine tailings impoundment structure.

Investigations of, and reports on subsurface conditions involving such matters as exploratory pits, trenches, and adits, drilling, coring, geophysical surveys, tests to determine leakage rates, and physical tests to measure in place the property and behavior of foundation materials at the impoundment structure site.

Investigation of and reports on the geology of the impoundment structure site and its vicinity, possible geological hazards, availability and quality of construction materials, and other pertinent factors.

The plans, drawings and specifications shall be of such character and size setting forth such pertinent details and dimensions and in such form as the director requires consistent with good engineering practice. Plans, drawings and specifications which are submitted to the department shall be prepared by or under the direction of a professional engineer who is entitled to practice the profession of engineering pursuant to chapter 12, title 54, Idaho Code.

Where said mine tailings impoundment structure is, in the opinion of the director, not of sufficient importance to have the provisions of the section apply to such structure, then the director shall have power, upon written application, to suspend the provisions of this section in regard to such structure.

§ 42-1722 — 42-1729. [Reserved.]

The legislature finds and declares that:

The water resources and waterways of Idaho constitute a valuable renewable resource;

The welfare of the people of Idaho is dependent upon conservation, development and optimum use of our water resources and waterways;

State regulation of development and use of our water resources and waterways is necessary to ensure water is available to meet the present and future needs of the people of Idaho;

The development of Idaho’s water resources for hydropower, irrigation, domestic, commercial, municipal, industrial and other uses in a manner that considers competing uses and values provides important benefits to the people of Idaho;

Comprehensive planning is necessary to minimize conflicts between competing uses and to ensure optimal protection of all beneficial uses of water;

A single state agency should formulate a comprehensive state water plan;

Selected rivers possessing outstanding fish and wildlife, recreational, aesthetic, historic, cultural, natural or geologic values should be protected for the public benefit and enjoyment;

Section 401 of the federal clean water act gives the state certification authority to regulate activities licensed or permitted by federal agencies to insure the protection of the quality of state water; and

The comprehensive state water plan required by this chapter shall not alter any existing responsibilities, jurisdiction or planning functions of state agencies established by state or federal law.

§ 42-1731. Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Alteration” means any activity using mechanized equipment that moves or overturns gravel or earth.

“Board” means the Idaho water resource board.

“Comprehensive state water plan” means the plan adopted by the board pursuant to section 42-1734A, Idaho Code, or a component of such plan developed for a particular water resource, waterway or waterways and approved by the legislature.

“Dredge or placer mining” means any dredge or other placer mining operation to recover minerals with the use of a dredge boat or sluice washing plant whether fed by bucket line as a part of such dredge or by a separate dragline or any other method including, but not limited to, suction dredges which are capable of moving more than two (2) cubic yards per hour of earth material.

“Hydropower project” means any development which uses a flow of water as a source of electrical or mechanical power, or which regulates the flow of water for the purpose of generating electrical or mechanical power. A hydropower project development includes all powerhouses, dams, water conduits, transmission lines, water impoundments, roads, and other appurtenant works and structures.

“Interim protected river” means a waterway designated pursuant to section 42-1734D or 42-1734H, Idaho Code, as protected for up to two (2) years while a component of the comprehensive state water plan is prepared for that waterway.

“Natural river” means a waterway which possesses outstanding fish and wildlife, recreation, geologic or aesthetic values, which are free of substantial existing man-made impoundments, dams or other structures, and of which the riparian areas are largely undeveloped, although accessible in places by trails and roads.

“Protected river” means a waterway protected in the comprehensive state water plan by designation as either a natural river or a recreational river.

“Recreational river” means a waterway which possesses outstanding fish and wildlife, recreation, geologic or aesthetic values, and which might include some man-made development within the waterway or within the riparian area of the waterway.

“Riparian area” means that area within one hundred (100) feet of the mean highwater mark of a waterway.

“State agency” means any board, commission, department or executive agency of the state of Idaho.

“Stream bed” means a natural water course of perceptible extent with definite bed and banks, which confines and conducts the water of a waterway which lies below and between the ordinary high water mark on either side of that waterway.

“Waterway” means a river, stream, creek, lake or spring, or a portion thereof, and shall not include any tributary thereof.

§ 42-1732. Idaho water resource board.

Pursuant to the provisions of article 15, section 7, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, there is hereby established as the constitutional water agency within the department of water resources the Idaho water resource board which shall consist of eight (8) appointed members. The eight (8) appointed members shall be qualified electors of the state, no more than four (4) of whom shall be members of the same political party. Appointment of board members shall be made solely upon consideration of their knowledge, interest and active participation in the field of reclamation, water use or conservation and no member shall be appointed a member of the board unless he shall be well informed upon, interested in, and engaged actively in the field of reclamation, water use or conservation of water. Four (4) of these members shall be appointed at large and no more than three (3) of the eight (8) members shall be residents of a single district. To insure representation of water users of all geographic locations of the state, one (1) member shall be appointed from each of the following districts:

District No. 1 which shall consist of the counties of Boundary, Bonner, Kootenai, Shoshone, Benewah, Latah, Clearwater, Nez Perce, Lewis and Idaho;

District No. 2 which shall consist of the counties of Adams, Valley, Washington, Payette, Gem, Boise, Canyon, Ada, Elmore and Owyhee;

District No. 3 which shall consist of the counties of Camas, Gooding, Jerome, Twin Falls, Cassia, Blaine, Lincoln, Minidoka, Lemhi, Custer and Butte;

District No. 4 which shall consist of the counties of Clark, Fremont, Jefferson, Madison, Teton, Bingham, Bonneville, Power, Bannock, Caribou, Oneida, Franklin and Bear Lake.

All appointments shall be made by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. As soon as practicable after passage of this act, the governor shall appoint all eight (8) members; four (4) members shall be appointed to terms which will expire on January 1, 1967, four (4) members shall be appointed to terms which will expire on January 1, 1969, and thereafter all appointments shall be to four (4) year terms. Any vacancy caused by death, removal, disqualification, or resignation, shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term caused by the vacancy. The appointed members shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(h), Idaho Code.

§ 42-1733. Organization.

The business of the board shall be conducted as follows:

The first meeting of the board shall be held in the city of Boise within thirty (30) days following its appointment and thereafter the board shall hold no less than four (4) regular meetings annually on dates and at places set by the board. The board shall maintain its principal office in Ada county. Special meetings of the board may be held by call of the chairman, four (4) of the members of the board, or the governor. A majority of board members at any meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. No notice shall be required for regular, special or adjourned meetings, providing the time and place of the meeting is fixed at a meeting at which all of the board members are in attendance. Otherwise, five (5) days written or telegraphic notice setting out the time, place and purpose of the meeting shall be required. Any meeting of the board at which all of the members are present shall be as valid as if held pursuant to notice. Members may waive notice in writing either before or at the time of the meeting.

All meetings at which official action is taken by the board shall be open to the public; the board may hold executive sessions at which no official action is taken.

At its first meeting the board shall elect one (1) of its members chairman and one (1) of its members vice chairman. Such officers shall hold their respective offices for a period of two (2) years and until their successors are elected and qualified. Should a vacancy occur in either office, the board shall elect a member to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.

The chairman shall preside at all meetings of the board, perform the normal duties of that office and such other duties as may be required of him by the board.

The vice chairman shall possess all of the powers and perform all of the duties of the chairman in the event of the death, absence, disability or refusal to act on the part of the chairman, and such authority shall extend until a new chairman has been elected and qualified. He shall also perform such other duties as may be required of him by the board.

The board shall select a secretary who may be a member of the board. The secretary shall be responsible for full and accurate minutes of all meetings of the board, a record of its proceedings, and every ruling, order and decision made by it. He shall also perform such other duties as may be required of him.

The board shall adopt a seal having upon it the words, “Idaho water resource board,” which shall be placed in the care and custody of the director.

Each member of the board shall, before entering upon the discharge of his official duties, file with the secretary of state the statutory oath of office to which, and as a part thereof, shall be added a declaration of the political party to which said board member belongs.

§ 42-1734. Powers and duties.

The board shall, subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, have the following powers and duties:

To have and exercise all of the rights, powers, duties and privileges vested by article XV, section 7, of the constitution of this state in the water resource agency, and the water resource board, herein created, is hereby constituted the water resource agency;

To institute judicial proceedings to have water rights established by court decree on any stream, lake or underground water basin; in such proceedings court costs of the action, including the survey and determination of water uses by the director of the department of water resources, shall be borne by the state;

To appear, when requested by the governor, on behalf of and represent the state in matters related to its duties in any proceeding, negotiation, or hearing involving the federal government or other state; provided, however, that compact commissions now established by law shall continue to act but in so doing shall report to it;

To accept, receive, initiate, investigate, consider and promote such water projects as it deems to be in the public interest;

To generate and wholesale hydroelectric power at the site of production if such power production is connected with another purpose for such project;

To file applications and obtain permits in the name of the board, to appropriate, store, or use the unappropriated waters of any body, stream, or other surface or underground source of water for specific water projects. Such filings and appropriations by the board, or any water rights owned or claimed by the board, shall be made in the same manner and subject to all of the state laws relating to appropriation of water, with the exception that the board will not be required to pay any fees required by the laws of this state for its appropriations. The filings and appropriations by the board shall be subject to contest or legal action the same as any other filing and appropriation, and such filings and appropriations shall not have priority over or affect existing prior water rights of any kind or nature; provided that the board shall have the right to file for water rights with appropriate officials of other states as trustee for project users, and to do all things necessary in connection therewith;

To finance said projects with revenue bonds or such moneys as may be available;

To acquire, purchase, lease, or exchange land, rights, water rights, easements, franchises and other property deemed necessary or proper for the construction, operation and maintenance of water projects;

To exercise, in accordance with the provisions of title 7, chapter 7, Idaho Code, the right of eminent domain to acquire property necessary for the construction of projects, both land and water;

To cooperate in all water studies, planning, research, or activities with any state or local agency in this state, or any other state or any federal agency and to enter into contracts with federal, state and local governmental agencies to effect this purpose;

To present to the governor for presentation to the legislature not later than the 30th of November prior to the convening of a regular legislative session the final report containing the complete plans, costs and feasibility estimates for any water project which the board recommends that the state construct in accordance with the comprehensive state water plan; and to construct any water project specifically authorized by the legislature;
(12) To enter into contracts with political subdivisions, municipal entities, individuals and others for the rehabilitation and repair of existing irrigation projects and irrigation facilities, the sale and/or lease of water, use of water, water storage, electric power, or other service, to turn over projects to water users after pay-out and to lease facilities, sell, lease or dispose of surplus facilities subject to the provisions of applicable law;

(13) To enter into contracts to effect the purposes of this chapter;

(14) To sue and be sued;

(15) To study and examine pollution of rivers, streams, lakes and ground water, and to advise, cooperate and counsel with the state board of environmental quality in a manner designed to avoid inhibition of economic development and at the same time insure the right of the people to comfortably enjoy our water resources and accomplish the establishment of water quality criteria;

(16) To call upon any other state agency for cooperation, assistance or use of information available to such agency; provided, however, if such agency is required to make substantial expenditures in responding to such request, appropriate arrangements for compensation may be accomplished;

(17) To issue revenue bonds for the rehabilitation and repair of existing irrigation projects and irrigation facilities, and for water projects, pledge any revenues available to the board to secure said bonds, exclusive of any revenues derived from legislative appropriations, provided that any amounts received from loan repayments regardless of the source of funds for the loan may be pledged, and pool revenues from one (1) or more projects constructed, financed or operated by the board, or existing irrigation project or facilities rehabilitated or repaired by the board;

(18) To formulate and recommend, prior to each session of the legislature, proposed legislation that may be necessary to assist it in effecting a proper plan for conservation, development and utilization of water resources and waterways and to report to each session of the legislature on the public business entrusted to its care and the financial affairs of the board. In the period between legislative sessions, the board shall deposit with the legislative council statements describing all actions taken and projects undertaken by it;

(19) To issue procedural and operative rules as may be necessary for the conduct of its business;

(20) To appoint advisory boards when deemed desirable to aid in the execution of its powers;

(21) To take such other action as may be necessary to carry out its duties and powers under this chapter and the constitution of the state of Idaho;

(22) To loan without prior legislative approval, the proceeds of the sale of revenue bonds to the local water project sponsor or sponsors; to enter into lease, sale or loan agreement; and to purchase all or a portion of, or participate in, loans, originated by private lending institutions.